Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.020

Name of system.

The name of the retirement system provided for in this chapter shall be the "Washington State Teachers' Retirement System" and by this name all of its business shall be transacted and all of its funds invested and all of its cash, securities and other property held.

[ 1947 c 80 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-21. Prior: 1937 c 221 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-2.]